tests/possessives.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../tyv.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../tyv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "Noun теве":
    теве<n><px1sg><nom> : тевем
    теве<n><px1sg><gen> : тевемниң
    теве<n><px1sg><dat> : тевемге
    теве<n><px1sg><acc> : тевемни
    теве<n><px1sg><loc> : тевемде
    теве<n><px1sg><abl> : тевемден
    теве<n><px1sg><all> : тевемче
    теве<n><px2sg><nom> : тевең
    теве<n><px2sg><gen> : тевеңниң
    теве<n><px2sg><dat> : тевеңге
    теве<n><px2sg><acc> : тевеңни
    теве<n><px2sg><loc> : тевеңде
    теве<n><px2sg><abl> : тевеңден
    теве<n><px2sg><all> : тевеңче
    теве<n><px3sp><nom> : тевези
    теве<n><px3sp><gen> : тевезиниң
    теве<n><px3sp><dat> : тевезинге
    теве<n><px3sp><acc> : тевезин
    теве<n><px3sp><loc> : тевезинде
    теве<n><px3sp><abl> : тевезинден
    теве<n><px3sp><all> : тевезинче
    теве<n><px1pl><nom> : тевевис
    теве<n><px1pl><gen> : тевевистиң
    теве<n><px1pl><dat> : тевевиске
    теве<n><px1pl><acc> : тевевисти
    теве<n><px1pl><loc> : тевевисте
    теве<n><px1pl><abl> : тевевистен
    теве<n><px1pl><all> : тевевисче
    теве<n><px2pl><nom> : тевеңер
    теве<n><px2pl><gen> : тевеңерниң
    теве<n><px2pl><dat> : тевеңерге
    теве<n><px2pl><acc> : тевеңерни
    теве<n><px2pl><loc> : тевеңерде
    теве<n><px2pl><abl> : тевеңерден
    теве<n><px2pl><all> : тевеңерже
    теве<n><pl><px1sg><nom> : тевелерим
    теве<n><pl><px1sg><gen> : тевелеримниң
    теве<n><pl><px1sg><dat> : тевелеримге
    теве<n><pl><px1sg><acc> : тевелеримни
    теве<n><pl><px1sg><loc> : тевелеримде
    теве<n><pl><px1sg><abl> : тевелеримден
    теве<n><pl><px1sg><all> : тевелеримче
    теве<n><pl><px2sg><nom> : тевелериң
    теве<n><pl><px2sg><gen> : тевелериңниң
    теве<n><pl><px2sg><dat> : тевелериңге
    теве<n><pl><px2sg><acc> : тевелериңни
    теве<n><pl><px2sg><loc> : тевелериңде
    теве<n><pl><px2sg><abl> : тевелериңден
    теве<n><pl><px2sg><all> : тевелериңче
    теве<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : тевелери
    теве<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : тевелериниң
    теве<n><pl><px3sp><dat> : тевелеринге
    теве<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : тевелерин
    теве<n><pl><px3sp><loc> : тевелеринде
    теве<n><pl><px3sp><abl> : тевелеринден
    теве<n><pl><px3sp><all> : тевелеринче
    теве<n><pl><px1pl><nom> : тевелеривис
    теве<n><pl><px1pl><gen> : тевелеривистиң
    теве<n><pl><px1pl><dat> : тевелеривиске
    теве<n><pl><px1pl><acc> : тевелеривисти
    теве<n><pl><px1pl><loc> : тевелеривисте
    теве<n><pl><px1pl><abl> : тевелеривистен
    теве<n><pl><px1pl><all> : тевелеривисче
    теве<n><pl><px2pl><nom> : тевелериңер
    теве<n><pl><px2pl><gen> : тевелериңерниң
    теве<n><pl><px2pl><dat> : тевелериңерге
    теве<n><pl><px2pl><acc> : тевелериңерни
    теве<n><pl><px2pl><loc> : тевелериңерде
    теве<n><pl><px2pl><abl> : тевелериңерден
    теве<n><pl><px2pl><all> : тевелериңерже


 "Noun ном":
    ном<n><px1sg><nom> : номум
    ном<n><px1sg><gen> : номумның
    ном<n><px1sg><dat> : номумга
    ном<n><px1sg><acc> : номумну
    ном<n><px1sg><loc> : номумда
    ном<n><px1sg><abl> : номумдан
    ном<n><px1sg><all> : номумче
    ном<n><px2sg><nom> : номуң
    ном<n><px2sg><gen> : номуңнуң
    ном<n><px2sg><dat> : номуңга
    ном<n><px2sg><acc> : номуңну
    ном<n><px2sg><loc> : номуңда
    ном<n><px2sg><abl> : номуңдан
    ном<n><px2sg><all> : номуңче
    ном<n><px3sp><nom> : ному
    ном<n><px3sp><gen> : номунуң
    ном<n><px3sp><dat> : номунга
    ном<n><px3sp><acc> : номун
    ном<n><px3sp><loc> : номунда
    ном<n><px3sp><abl> : номундан
    ном<n><px3sp><all> : номунче
    ном<n><px1pl><nom> : номувус
    ном<n><px1pl><gen> : номувустуң
    ном<n><px1pl><dat> : номувуска
    ном<n><px1pl><acc> : номувусту
    ном<n><px1pl><loc> : номувуста
    ном<n><px1pl><abl> : номувустан
    ном<n><px1pl><all> : номувусче
    ном<n><px2pl><nom> : номуңар
    ном<n><px2pl><gen> : номуңарнуң
    ном<n><px2pl><dat> : номуңарга
    ном<n><px2pl><acc> : номуңарну
    ном<n><px2pl><loc> : номуңарда
    ном<n><px2pl><abl> : номуңардан
    ном<n><px2pl><all> : номуңарже
    ном<n><pl><px1sg><nom> : номнарым
    ном<n><pl><px1sg><gen> : номнарымның
    ном<n><pl><px1sg><dat> : номнарымга
    ном<n><pl><px1sg><acc> : номнарымны
    ном<n><pl><px1sg><loc> : номнарымда
    ном<n><pl><px1sg><abl> : номнарымдан
    ном<n><pl><px1sg><all> : номнарымче
    ном<n><pl><px2sg><nom> : номнарың
    ном<n><pl><px2sg><gen> : номнарыңның
    ном<n><pl><px2sg><dat> : номнарыңга
    ном<n><pl><px2sg><acc> : номнарыңны
    ном<n><pl><px2sg><loc> : номнарыңда
    ном<n><pl><px2sg><abl> : номнарыңдан
    ном<n><pl><px2sg><all> : номнарыңче
    ном<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : номнары
    ном<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : номнарының
    ном<n><pl><px3sp><dat> : номнарынга
    ном<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : номнарын
    ном<n><pl><px3sp><loc> : номнарында
    ном<n><pl><px3sp><abl> : номнарындан
    ном<n><pl><px3sp><all> : номнарынче
    ном<n><pl><px1pl><nom> : номнарывыс
    ном<n><pl><px1pl><gen> : номнарывыстың
    ном<n><pl><px1pl><dat> : номнарывыске
    ном<n><pl><px1pl><acc> : номнарывысты
    ном<n><pl><px1pl><loc> : номнарывысте
    ном<n><pl><px1pl><abl> : номнарывыстен
    ном<n><pl><px1pl><all> : номнарывысче
    ном<n><pl><px2pl><nom> : номнарыңар
    ном<n><pl><px2pl><gen> : номнарыңарның
    ном<n><pl><px2pl><dat> : номнарыңарга
    ном<n><pl><px2pl><acc> : номнарыңарны
    ном<n><pl><px2pl><loc> : номнарыңарда
    ном<n><pl><px2pl><abl> : номнарыңардан
    ном<n><pl><px2pl><all> : номнарыңарже

 "Noun соо":
    соң<n><px1sg><nom> : соом
    соң<n><px1sg><gen> : соомнуң
    соң<n><px1sg><dat> : соомга
    соң<n><px1sg><acc> : соомну
    соң<n><px1sg><loc> : соомда
    соң<n><px1sg><abl> : соомдан
    соң<n><px1sg><all> : соомче
    соң<n><px2sg><nom> : сооң
    соң<n><px2sg><gen> : сооңнуң
    соң<n><px2sg><dat> : сооңга
    соң<n><px2sg><acc> : сооңну
    соң<n><px2sg><loc> : сооңда
    соң<n><px2sg><abl> : сооңдан
    соң<n><px2sg><all> : сооңче
    соң<n><px3sp><nom> : соо
    соң<n><px3sp><gen> : соонуң
    соң<n><px3sp><dat> : соонга
    соң<n><px3sp><acc> : соон
    соң<n><px3sp><loc> : соонда
    соң<n><px3sp><abl> : соондан
    соң<n><px3sp><all> : соонче
    соң<n><px1pl><nom> : соовус
    соң<n><px1pl><gen> : соовустуң
    соң<n><px1pl><dat> : соовуска
    соң<n><px1pl><acc> : соовусту
    соң<n><px1pl><loc> : соовуста
    соң<n><px1pl><abl> : соовустан
    соң<n><px1pl><all> : соовусче
    соң<n><px2pl><nom> : сооңар
    соң<n><px2pl><gen> : сооңарның
    соң<n><px2pl><dat> : сооңарга
    соң<n><px2pl><acc> : сооңарны
    соң<n><px2pl><loc> : сооңарда
    соң<n><px2pl><abl> : сооңардан
    соң<n><px2pl><all> : сооңарже
 

 "Noun хуу":
    хуу<n><px1sg><nom> : хуум
    хуу<n><px1sg><gen> : хуумнуң
    хуу<n><px1sg><dat> : хуумга
    хуу<n><px1sg><acc> : хуумну
    хуу<n><px1sg><loc> : хуумда
    хуу<n><px1sg><abl> : хуумдан
    хуу<n><px1sg><all> : хуумче
    хуу<n><px2sg><nom> : хууң
    хуу<n><px2sg><gen> : хууңнуң
    хуу<n><px2sg><dat> : хууңга
    хуу<n><px2sg><acc> : хууңну
    хуу<n><px2sg><loc> : хууңда
    хуу<n><px2sg><abl> : хууңдан
    хуу<n><px2sg><all> : хууңче
    хуу<n><px3sp><nom> : хуузу
    хуу<n><px3sp><gen> : хуузунуң
    хуу<n><px3sp><dat> : хуузунга
    хуу<n><px3sp><acc> : хуузун
    хуу<n><px3sp><loc> : хуузунда
    хуу<n><px3sp><abl> : хуузундан
    хуу<n><px3sp><all> : хуузунче
    хуу<n><px1pl><nom> : хуувус
    хуу<n><px1pl><gen> : хуувустуң
    хуу<n><px1pl><dat> : хуувуска
    хуу<n><px1pl><acc> : хуувусту
    хуу<n><px1pl><loc> : хуувуста
    хуу<n><px1pl><abl> : хуувустан
    хуу<n><px1pl><all> : хуувусче
    хуу<n><px2pl><nom> : хууңар
    хуу<n><px2pl><gen> : хууңарнуң
    хуу<n><px2pl><dat> : хууңарга
    хуу<n><px2pl><acc> : хууңарну
    хуу<n><px2pl><loc> : хууңарда
    хуу<n><px2pl><abl> : хууңардан
    хуу<n><px2pl><all> : хууңарже
    хуу<n><pl><px1sg><nom> : хууларым
    хуу<n><pl><px1sg><gen> : хууларымның
    хуу<n><pl><px1sg><dat> : хууларымга
    хуу<n><pl><px1sg><acc> : хууларымны
    хуу<n><pl><px1sg><loc> : хууларымда
    хуу<n><pl><px1sg><abl> : хууларымдан
    хуу<n><pl><px1sg><all> : хууларымче
    хуу<n><pl><px2sg><nom> : хууларың
    хуу<n><pl><px2sg><gen> : хууларыңның
    хуу<n><pl><px2sg><dat> : хууларыңга
    хуу<n><pl><px2sg><acc> : хууларыңны
    хуу<n><pl><px2sg><loc> : хууларыңда
    хуу<n><pl><px2sg><abl> : хууларыңдан
    хуу<n><pl><px2sg><all> : хууларыңче
    хуу<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : хуулары
    хуу<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : хууларының
    хуу<n><pl><px3sp><dat> : хууларынга
    хуу<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : хууларын
    хуу<n><pl><px3sp><loc> : хууларында
    хуу<n><pl><px3sp><abl> : хууларындан
    хуу<n><pl><px3sp><all> : хууларынче
    хуу<n><pl><px1pl><nom> : хууларывыс
    хуу<n><pl><px1pl><gen> : хууларывыстың
    хуу<n><pl><px1pl><dat> : хууларывыска
    хуу<n><pl><px1pl><acc> : хууларывысты
    хуу<n><pl><px1pl><loc> : хууларывыста
    хуу<n><pl><px1pl><abl> : хууларывыстан
    хуу<n><pl><px1pl><all> : хууларывысче
    хуу<n><pl><px2pl><nom> : хууларыңар
    хуу<n><pl><px2pl><gen> : хууларыңарның
    хуу<n><pl><px2pl><dat> : хууларыңарга
    хуу<n><pl><px2pl><acc> : хууларыңарны
    хуу<n><pl><px2pl><loc> : хууларыңарда
    хуу<n><pl><px2pl><abl> : хууларыңардан
    хуу<n><pl><px2pl><all> : хууларыңарже


 "Noun чаъс":
    чаъс<n><px1sg><nom> : чазым
    чаъс<n><px1sg><gen> : чазымның
    чаъс<n><px1sg><dat> : чазымга
    чаъс<n><px1sg><acc> : чазымны
    чаъс<n><px1sg><loc> : чазымда
    чаъс<n><px1sg><abl> : чазымдан
    чаъс<n><px1sg><all> : чазымче
    чаъс<n><px2sg><nom> : чазың
    чаъс<n><px2sg><gen> : чазыңның
    чаъс<n><px2sg><dat> : чазыңга
    чаъс<n><px2sg><acc> : чазыңны
    чаъс<n><px2sg><loc> : чазыңда
    чаъс<n><px2sg><abl> : чазыңдан
    чаъс<n><px2sg><all> : чазыңче
    чаъс<n><px3sp><nom> : чазы
    чаъс<n><px3sp><gen> : чазының
    чаъс<n><px3sp><dat> : чазынга
    чаъс<n><px3sp><acc> : чазын
    чаъс<n><px3sp><loc> : чазында
    чаъс<n><px3sp><abl> : чазындан
    чаъс<n><px3sp><all> : чазынче
    чаъс<n><px1pl><nom> : чазывыс
    чаъс<n><px1pl><gen> : чазывыстың
    чаъс<n><px1pl><dat> : чазывыска
    чаъс<n><px1pl><acc> : чазывысты
    чаъс<n><px1pl><loc> : чазывыста
    чаъс<n><px1pl><abl> : чазывыстан
    чаъс<n><px1pl><all> : чазывысче
    чаъс<n><px2pl><nom> : чазыңар
    чаъс<n><px2pl><gen> : чазыңарның
    чаъс<n><px2pl><dat> : чазыңарга
    чаъс<n><px2pl><acc> : чазыңарны
    чаъс<n><px2pl><loc> : чазыңарда
    чаъс<n><px2pl><abl> : чазыңардан
    чаъс<n><px2pl><all> : чазыңарже
    чаъс<n><pl><px1sg><nom> : чаъстарым
    чаъс<n><pl><px1sg><gen> : чаъстарымның
    чаъс<n><pl><px1sg><dat> : чаъстарымга
    чаъс<n><pl><px1sg><acc> : чаъстарымны
    чаъс<n><pl><px1sg><loc> : чаъстарымда
    чаъс<n><pl><px1sg><abl> : чаъстарымдан
    чаъс<n><pl><px1sg><all> : чаъстарымче
    чаъс<n><pl><px2sg><nom> : чаъстарың
    чаъс<n><pl><px2sg><gen> : чаъстарыңның
    чаъс<n><pl><px2sg><dat> : чаъстарыңга
    чаъс<n><pl><px2sg><acc> : чаъстарыңны
    чаъс<n><pl><px2sg><loc> : чаъстарыңда
    чаъс<n><pl><px2sg><abl> : чаъстарыңдан
    чаъс<n><pl><px2sg><all> : чаъстарыңче
    чаъс<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : чаъстары
    чаъс<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : чаъстарының
    чаъс<n><pl><px3sp><dat> : чаъстарынга
    чаъс<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : чаъстарын
    чаъс<n><pl><px3sp><loc> : чаъстарында
    чаъс<n><pl><px3sp><abl> : чаъстарындан
    чаъс<n><pl><px3sp><all> : чаъстарынче
    чаъс<n><pl><px1pl><nom> : чаъстарывыс
    чаъс<n><pl><px1pl><gen> : чаъстарывыстың
    чаъс<n><pl><px1pl><dat> : чаъстарывыска
    чаъс<n><pl><px1pl><acc> : чаъстарывысты
    чаъс<n><pl><px1pl><loc> : чаъстарывыста
    чаъс<n><pl><px1pl><abl> : чаъстарывыстан
    чаъс<n><pl><px1pl><all> : чаъстарывысче
    чаъс<n><pl><px2pl><nom> : чаъстарыңар
    чаъс<n><pl><px2pl><gen> : чаъстарыңарның
    чаъс<n><pl><px2pl><dat> : чаъстарыңарга
    чаъс<n><pl><px2pl><acc> : чаъстарыңарны
    чаъс<n><pl><px2pl><loc> : чаъстарыңарда
    чаъс<n><pl><px2pl><abl> : чаъстарыңардан
    чаъс<n><pl><px2pl><all> : чаъстарыңарже
